pl: Profil dopasowania: Anatomiczny; Niskoprofilowy; Zwężany; Tradycyjny; Inny
fr: Profil de coupe: Anatomique; Profil bas; Fuselé; Traditionnel; Autre
hr-HR: Profil prilagodbe: Anatomski; Niskog profila; Konusni; Tradicionalni; Ostalo
hu: Illesztési profil: Anatómiai; Alacsony profilú; Szűkített; Hagyományos; Egyéb
el: Προσαρμογή προφίλ: Ανατομικό; Χαμηλό προφίλ; Με κωνική εφαρμογή; Παραδοσιακό; Άλλο
nl: Pasvormprofiel: Anatomisch; Laag profiel; Toelopend; Traditioneel; Overige
bg-BG: Профил на прилягане: Анатомичен; Нисък профил; Скосен; Традиционен; Друго
pt-BR: Perfil de ajuste: Anatômico; Perfil baixo; Afilado; Tradicional; Outros
nb: Passformprofil: Anatomisk; Lavprofil; Smalnende; Tradisjonell; Annet
pt-PT: Perfil de ajuste: Anatómico; Perfil baixo; Afunilado; Tradicional; Outro
th: พอดีกับรูปทรง: ตามสรีระ; ทรงกะทัดรัด; ทรงสอบ; ทรงดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
tr: Uygun profil: Anatomik; Düşük profil; Daralan; Geleneksel; Diğer
sl-SI: Profil prileganja: Anatomski; Nizek profil; Stožčast; Tradicionalni; Drugo
sk-SK: Profil vnútorného priestoru: Anatomický; Nízkoprofilový; Zúžený; Tradičný; Iné
fi: Sopivuusprofiili: Anatominen; Matalaprofiilinen; Kapeneva; Perinteinen; Muu
zh-TW: 版型輪廓: 解剖學 / 符合人體工學; 貼合型 / 低平; 錐形 / 窄管; 傳統版型; 其他
zh-CN: 贴合轮廓: 人体工学贴合; 贴合; 锥形; 传统; 其他
ko: 핏 프로필: 해부학적 형태; 로우 프로파일; 테이퍼형; 전통형; 기타
lt-LT: Pritaikymo profilis: Anatominis; Žemo profilio; Siaurėjantis; Tradicinis; Kita
cs: Profil přizpůsobení: Anatomický; Nízký profil; Zúžený; Tradiční; Jiné
it: Profilo di adattamento: Anatomico; Basso profilo; Affusolato; Tradizionale; Altro
ro-RO: Profil de potrivire: Anatomic; Profil redus; Conic; Tradițional; Altele
en: Fit profile: Anatomical; Low profile; Tapered; Traditional; Other
ru: Профиль посадки: Анатомический; Низкий профиль; Зауженный; Традиционный; Другое
es: Perfil de ajuste: Anatómico; Perfil bajo; Cónico; Tradicional; Otro
da: Pasformsprofil: Anatomisk; Lav profil; Tilspidset; Traditionel; Andet
sv: Passformsprofil: Anatomisk; Låg profil; Avsmalnande; Traditionell; Övrigt
vi: Kiểu dáng: Ôm sát cơ thể; Gọn nhẹ; Ôm thon; Truyền thống; Khác
ja: フィットプロファイル: アナトミカル; ロープロファイル; テーパード; トラディショナル; その他
de: Passformprofil: Anatomisch; Low-Profile; Tapered; Traditionell; Sonstige